District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-301.87

Penalty for conducting affairs after issuance of proclamation.

Repealed.

History

Aug. 6, 1962, 76 Stat. 299, Pub. L. 87-569, § 87
Oct. 5, 1985, D.C. Law 6-42, § 431(b), 32 DCR 4450
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(l), 58 DCR 1720

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 29-301.87.
1981 Ed., § 29-588.
1973 Ed., § 29-1087.